Hawaii, session 2026, GM1195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State's roadways
may present safety risks to individuals that are stopped on the
shoulder or roadside due to a disabled vehicle. Although
existing law requires motorists to slow down and move over when
approaching certain emergency vehicles, the law allows unsafe
passing for all other vehicles. According to the National
Highway Traffic Safety Administration, nearly three thousand six
hundred fatalities occurred nationwide between 2014 and 2022
when ordinary drivers and passengers were stranded in or near
their disabled vehicles.
The legislature further finds that, as of 2025, twenty-nine
states have enacted comprehensive "move over" laws to cover all
disabled vehicles displaying hazard warning lights or other
recognized safety signals.
2026-3236 HB1692 CDl HMSO

■■iiiiiiniiiiiia

Page 2 H.■ B.1-.^ . NI O.
ghT

z
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to require drivers
approaching stationary vehicles displaying warning signals to
slow down and make a lane change if possible and safe to do so.
SECTION 2. Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§291C- Stationary vehicle stopped for emergencies;
duty of approaching vehicle. (a) A driver of a vehicle that is
approaching a stationary vehicle stopped in any location on the
roadway or shoulder, as Indicated by reasonable warning signals,
including vehicle hazard warning lights, road flares, traffic
cones, caution signs, or any other vehicular or nonvehicular
warning signs of the stopped stationary vehicle, shall slow down
to a reasonable and prudent speed that is safe under the
circumstances, and, if it is possible and safe to do so, make a
lane change to an adjacent lane; provided that if a lane change
is not possible or safe, the driver shall continue at a
reasonable and prudent speed and come to a complete stop if
necessary.
2026-3236 HB1692 GDI HMSO 2
inniiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHioii

Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) Violation of subsection (a) shall not be subject to
section 287-20, relating to furnishing proof of financial
responsibility.
A violation of subsection (a) shall constitute a violation
if no death or injury results from the violation; provided that
if a death or injury occurs and is attributable to the driver of
the vehicle, then the driver shall instead be charged under
section 707-702.5 for negligent homicide in the first degree;
section 707-703 for negligent homicide in the second degree;
section 707-704 for negligent homicide in the third degree;
section 707-705 for negligent injury in the first degree; or
section 707-706 for negligent injury in the second degree, as
applicable."
PART II
SECTION 3. Section 291-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (a) to (c) to read:
"(a) No person shall stand in the bed or load-carrying
area of any motor vehicle commonly known as a pickup truck while
the vehicle is in operation. No operator of any pickup truck
2026-3236 HB1692 CDl HMSO

■■lilllillllllllOIII

Page 4 H.B. NO.
I I 'I 2
C.D. 1
shall operate the vehicle with a passenger seated in the bed or
load-carrying area of the vehicle unless:
(1) There is no seating available in the cab of the
vehicle;
(2) The side racks of the vehicle are securely attached
and the tailboard or tailgate is securely closed; and
(3) Every passenger in the bed or load-carrying area of
the vehicle is seated on the floor and does not
attempt to control unlashed cargo.
(b) This section shall not apply to [pcrson-s]
(1) Persons or corporations operating a business or
businesses that serve the public, who or [whieh] th^
are subject to the jurisdiction, supervision, and
regulations prescribed by state agencies or
departments nor to their agents or employees when
engaged in the business of [such] these persons or
corporations [—12.
(2) Persons operating a pickup truck for the
transportation of agricultural or farm workers;
(3) Law enforcement, fire, and emergency medical services
vehicles engaged in official duties; and
2026-3236 HB1692 CDl HMSO 4

Page 5 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(4) Military vehicles engaged in official operations.
(c) No operator of any pickup truck [iftay] shall operate the
vehicle with any passenger [tweive] under sixteen years of age
[or- under] in the bed or load-carrying area of the vehicle,
unless one of the following applies:
(1) An emergency exists that threatens the life of the
passenger being transported in the bed or load­
carrying area of the vehicle; or
(2) The vehicle is being operated in parades, caravans, or
exhibitions [whieh] that are officially authorized or
otherwise permitted by law."
2. By amending subsection (e) to read:
"(e) As used in this section, "pickup truck" means a light
truck that has a cab on the front part of the vehicle covering
the driver's seat and an open bed behind the cab designed
primarily to transport property or cargo, with sides and a
tailgate to retain the contents within the confines of the bed,
and has a maximum gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of [1-1, 000]
eleven thousand pounds or less."
PART III
2026-3236 HB1692 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3236 HB1692 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO. 5^1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1692, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
/u.n'yU—
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1692, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
55-26